District of Columbia statutes.
6-103.01

Low-rent public housing projects.

All projects now operated and maintained by the National Capital Housing Authority pursuant to subchapter I of this chapter are deemed to be low-rent housing projects and may be consolidated, pursuant to § 1437 et seq. of Title 42, United States Code, into any contract for annual contributions covering projects maintained and operated pursuant to subchapter II of this chapter.

History

Aug. 1, 1968, 82 Stat. 607, Pub. L. 90-448, title XVII, § 1711

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-116.
1973 Ed., § 5-117.

References in Text

The reference to § 1437 et seq. of Title 42, United States Code has been substituted for “ § 1415(6) of Title 42, United States Code.” Former § 1415(6) of Title 42, United States Code, was omitted as superseded in the general revision of the United States Housing Act of 1937 by the Act of August 22, 1974, 88 Stat. 653, Pub. L. 93-383.